Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB67.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 3323. Outdoor solar access for drying clothes.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided in the declaration, an association shall be prohibited from imposing any unreasonable restriction that prohibits a person who occupies a unit from outdoor solar access for drying clothes within the boundaries of a unit or the limited common elements assigned to the unit.(b) Limitations.--The drying of clothes outdoors shall be limited to association-approved areas of a unit or the limited 12345678910111213141516171819 common elements assigned to the unit and shall be out of view from the front entrances or public areas of the association.(c) Rules and regulations.--An association may adopt reasonable rules and regulations detailing the time, place and manner of the drying of clothes outdoors and prohibit the drying of clothes outdoors if the drying of clothes poses a safety or fire hazard, impedes proper evacuation in the case of an emergency or obstructs the view from, or access to, other units.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the legal authority of an association to adopt and enforce any bylaw, rule or regulation on any matter other than the provision of outdoor solar access for drying clothes as specified under this section.§ 4324. Outdoor solar access for drying clothes.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided in the declaration, an association shall be prohibited from imposing any unreasonable restriction that prohibits a proprietary lessee with a possessory interest in a unit from outdoor solar access for drying clothes within the boundaries of a unit or the limited common elements assigned to the unit.(b) Limitations.--The drying of clothes outdoors shall be limited to association-approved areas of a unit or the limited common elements assigned to the unit and shall be out of view from the front entrances or public areas of the association.(c) Rules and regulations.--An association may adopt reasonable rules and regulations detailing the time, place and manner of the drying of clothes outdoors and prohibit the drying of clothes outdoors if the drying of clothes poses a safety or fire hazard, impedes proper evacuation in the case of an emergency or obstructs the view from, or access to, other units.20250HB0067PN0055 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the legal authority of an association to adopt and enforce any bylaw, rule or regulation on any matter other than the provision of outdoor solar access for drying clothes as specified under this section.§ 5323. Outdoor solar access for drying clothes.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided in the declaration, an association shall be prohibited from imposing any unreasonable restriction that prohibits a person who occupies a unit from outdoor solar access for drying clothes within the boundaries of a unit or the limited common elements assigned to the unit.(b) Limitations.--The drying of clothes outdoors shall be limited to association-approved areas of a unit or the limited common elements assigned to the unit and shall be out of view from the front entrances or public areas of the association.(c) Rules and regulations.--An association may adopt reasonable rules and regulations detailing the time, place and manner of the drying of clothes outdoors and prohibit the drying of clothes outdoors if the drying of clothes poses a safety or fire hazard, impedes proper evacuation in the case of an emergency or obstructs the view from, or access to, other units.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the legal authority of an association to adopt and enforce any bylaw, rule or regulation on any matter other than the provision of outdoor solar access for drying clothes as specified under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0067PN0055 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627